New York, session 2025-2026, A2546.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The commissioner of transportation shall conduct a study on 2 the feasibility and process for installing pedestrian control devices at 3 traffic intersections involving a state-owned public road where there 4 may be a high volume of pedestrians with visual and hearing impairments. 5 Such study shall include an estimate of how many intersections may 6 require such devices, the method used for determining such estimate, a 7 process for implementation, and the estimated costs involved. For 8 purposes of this act, "pedestrian control device" shall mean an elec- 9 tronically operated traffic control device composed of one or more indi- 10 cations which directs pedestrian traffic at signalized locations and 11 assists the visual and hearing impaired in safely crossing a traffic 12 intersection. 13 § 2. Upon completion of the study but no later than the thirty-first 14 of December next succeeding the date on which this act shall have become 15 a law, the commissioner of transportation shall submit a report based on 16 the findings of the study to the governor, the temporary president of 17 the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of the 18 senate, the minority leader of the assembly, the chair of the senate 19 transportation committee, and the chair of the assembly transportation 20 committee which shall include the findings and recommendations of the 21 study described in section one of this act. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 23 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04249-01-5